Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Chapter 13.2. Standards of Quality.
Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 22, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. The Department of Education shall perform a comprehensive review of the ongoing implementation of mandatory computer science standards in elementary schools and middle schools and the alignment of middle school and high school computer science courses and course pathways. Such review shall include recommendations for implementation processes at the local level, profiles of implementation processes that have been successful for school divisions, a description of opportunities for enhanced collaboration with relevant computer science stakeholders to expand computer science education opportunities for all students in the Commonwealth and for relevant professional development for teachers, and examining methods of data collection annually from local school divisions pertaining to computer science implementation. The Department of Education shall prepare a report on its comprehensive review and shall provide such report to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education and Health, the Secretary of Education, and the Superintendent of Public Instruction no later than November 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 294, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That the Board of Education shall include advanced directive education in its curriculum framework for the Health Standards of Learning for high school students.”

Acts
2022, cc. 549 and
550, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective beginning with the 2024-2025 school year.”

The 1998 amendments.

The 1998 amendment by cc. 602 and 627, effective July 1, 2003, are identical, and in subsection B, in the second paragraph deleted the former second sentence which read: “However, no revisions shall be implemented prior to July 1, 1994”; in subsection C, in the second paragraph, in the first sentence deleted “or who do not pass the literacy tests prescribed by the Board of Education” following “Program Tests,” deleted the former seventh sentence which read: “Any student who does not pass the literacy tests shall be required to attend a summer school program or participate in another form of remediation,” and deleted the former last sentence which read: “State funds shall be provided, as set forth in the appropriation act, for the attendance in remediation programs conducted by local school divisions for those students who do not pass the literacy tests beginning with the 1997-1998 fiscal year,” and in the next-to-last paragraph, in the first sentence inserted “academic” and deleted “of the literacy tests” following “failure”; and in subsection F, in the first sentence deleted “and those who fail the literacy tests prescribed by the Board” following “Program Tests.”

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendment by c. 377 added “as provided in the appropriation act” at the end of subsection E, and inserted “as” in the last sentence of the second paragraph in subsection G.

The 1999 amendment by c. 444, in the first paragraph of subsection C, inserted “and physical education” preceding “environmental issues,” and inserted “including, but need not be limited to, music and art” preceding “and practical arts.”

The 1999 amendment by c. 445 substituted “foreign language, or health education or physical education” for “or foreign language” in subsection H.

The 1999 amendment by c. 452 substituted “career education schools, and the teaching profession” for “and career education schools,” in subdivision D 3.

The 1999 amendment by c. 461 added subsection D 11.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 488 and 552 are identical, and substituted “clause (ii) of subsection A” for “subsection E” preceding “of § 22.1-254” in the second paragraph of subsection C.

The 1999 amendment by c. 595, effective July 1, 2000, in subsection G, in clause (i), substituted “twenty-four” for “twenty-five” in two places,
and substituted “twenty-nine” for “thirty,” and substituted “twenty-four” for “twenty-five” in clause (iii).

The 1999 amendment by c. 994, in subsection C, inserted “and physical education,” inserted “which may include, but need not be limited to, music and art,” and added the last sentence.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 504 inserted “Virginia history and world and United States” near the middle of the first sentence of subsection C.

The 2000 amendment by c. 547 added the last paragraph in subsection B.

The 2000 amendment by c. 653, in the last sentence of the sixth paragraph of subsection B, inserted the language beginning “shall (i) in consultation” and ending “testing and (ii)” and deleted “shall” preceding “conduct a regular analysis.”

The 2000 amendment by c. 662 added the last three sentences to the fourth paragraph of subsection B.

The 2000 amendment by c. 677 added the present next-to-last sentence in the sixth paragraph of subsection B.

The 2000 amendment by c. 684 rewrote subsection C.

The 2000 amendment by c. 710 added “in a manner it deems appropriate” to the second sentence of the fourth paragraph of subsection B.

The 2000 amendment by c. 750, in subsection B, substituted “shall” for “may” and added the last sentence in the sixth paragraph.

The 2000 amendment by c. 867, in the second sentence of the second paragraph in subsection B, deleted “and” preceding “decision” and inserted “and proficiency in the use of computers and related technology” following “making”; substituted “proficiency in the use of computers and related technology” for “technological proficiency” in the first sentence of subsection C; in subsection G, divided the former second paragraph into two paragraphs by inserting the 1 designator, and added the 2 designator at the beginning of the former third paragraph; and substituted “Shall assign instructional personnel” for “In addition, instructional personnel shall be assigned by each school board” at the beginning of present subdivision G 2.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 483 substituted “career and technical” for “vocational” in the fourth paragraph of subsection B, in subdivision D 4, in subsection E and in subsection H; substituted “Career and technical education” for “Occupational vocational” in the fourth paragraph of subsection B; substituted “that” for “which” in the sixth paragraph of subsection C and in subdivision D 1; substituted “subdivision” for “subsection” in subdivision D 4; and substituted “career and technical education” for “vocational preparation” in subdivision D 5.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 837, in subdivision D 4, twice substituted “disabled” for “handicapped,” and added the last sentence.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 690 inserted “(i),” “(ii) the appropriate learning environment designed to promote student achievement;” and “(iii) the” in subsection A; substituted “85 percent” for “eighty-five percent” in subsection E; and in subsection G, substituted “24 to 1” for “twenty-four to one” in clauses (i), (ii), (iii) and (v), substituted “29 students” for “twenty-nine students” and “twenty-four pupils” for “twenty-four pupils” in clause (i), substituted “30 students” for “thirty students” in clauses (ii) and (iii), substituted “25 to 1” for “twenty-five to one” in clause (iv) and in subdivision 2, and substituted “18 to 1” for “eighteen to one” in clause (i), and “20 to 1” for “twenty to one” in clause (ii), of the first sentence of subdivision 1.

The 2003 amendment by c. 697, in subsection C, deleted “or” following “Program Tests” near the middle, and added “or who fail an end-of-course test required for the award of a verified unit of credit required for the student’s graduation” at the end, of the second paragraph, deleted “the literacy tests or” following “does not pass” near the beginning of the first sentence, and inserted “or an end-of-course test required for the award of a verified unit of credit required for the student’s graduation” at the end of the third sentence, of the third paragraph; substituted “K through 3 that emphasize” for “K through 3 which emphasize” in subdivision D 1; substituted “85 percent” for “eighty-five percent” near the end of subsection E; and in subsection G, substituted “24 to 1” for “twenty-four to one” in clauses (i), (ii), (iii) and (v), substituted “29 students” for “twenty-nine students” and “twenty-four pupils” for “twenty-four pupils” in clause (i), substituted “30 students” for “thirty students” in clauses (ii) and (iii), substituted “25 to 1” for “twenty-five to one” in clause (iv) and in subdivision 2, and substituted “18 to 1” for “eighteen to one” in clause (i), and “20 to 1” for “twenty to one” in clause (ii), of the first sentence of subdivision 1.

The 2003 amendment by c. 714 substituted “K through 3 that emphasize” for “K through 3 which emphasize” in subdivision D 1; added subdivision D 12; substituted “85 percent” for “eighty-five percent” near the end of the third sentence of subsection E; added subsection F1; in the introductory paragraph of subsection G, substituted “24 to 1” for “twenty-four to one” in clauses (i), (ii), (iii) and (v), substituted “29 students” for “twenty-nine students” and “24 pupils” for “twenty-four pupils” in clause (i), substituted “30 students” for “thirty students” in clauses (ii) and (iii), and substituted “25 to 1 in grades” for “twenty-five to one in grades” and“35 students” for “thirty-five students” in clause (iv); substituted “18 to 1” for “eighteen to one” in clasue (i) and “20 to 1” for “twenty to one” in clause (ii) of the first sentence of subdivision G 1; substituted “25 to 1” for “twenty-five to one” near the end of subdivision G 2; and substituted “counted in ADM in the relevant school” for “counted in average daily membership (ADM) in the relevant school” in the first and second sentences of subsection H.

The 2003 amendment by c. 861 in subsection A, inserted the designator (i) and added clause (ii); in subsection E, substituted “85” for “eighty-five”; throughout out subsection G, substituted “24” for “twenty-four” and “1” for “one”, “29” for “twenty-nine”, and “30” for “thirty”; in subdivision G 1, substituted “18” for “eighteen”, “1” for “one”, “20” for “twenty”; in subdivision G 2 substituted “25” for “twenty-five” and “1” for “one.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 404, in the eighth paragraph of subsection B, in the first sentence, inserted the (a) designator and “(b) provide for timely review of test scores . . . federal No Child Left Behind Act of 2001 (P.L. 107-110); and”; redesignated former subsections F1 through H as present subsections G through I; and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2004 amendment by c. 848 inserted “entrepreneurship and small business ownership” in the first sentence of subdivision D 3, inserted “dual enrollment and” in subdivision D 11, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 939 and 955 are identical, and rewrote the section.

This section is set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 331 and 450 are nearly identical, and added “and reaching their full potential” at the end of the first sentence in subsection A; in subsection B, added the last sentence in the seventh paragraph and in the first sentence of the next-to-last paragraph, substituted “include in” for “supplement” and deleted “to ensure”
following “social science”; in the first paragraph of subsection C, divided the former first sentence into the present first and last sentences by substituting “is aligned to the Standards of Learning and meets or exceeds the requirements of the Board of Education” for “emphasizes” and in the last sentence, added “The program of instruction shall emphasize” at the beginning and deleted “in the case of children with disabilities” preceding “to qualify for appropriate training”; added subdivision D 14; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 234, in subsection C, substituted “education, gainful employment, or training in a career or technical field; and” for “education and employment, or to qualify for appropriate training; and” and added “and to achieve economic self-sufficiency” at the end of the second sentence of the first paragraph, deleted “required for the student’s graduation” at the end of the first sentence of the second paragraph, added the second sentence of the second paragraph, substituted “who achieves a passing score on one” for “who passes one” near the beginning of the third paragraph, substituted “fails to achieve a passing score on all of” for “fails all four of” and “a remediation program” for “a summer school program” and inserted “or who fails an end-of-course test required for the award of a verified unit of credit” in the first sentence of the fourth paragraph, and in the fifth paragraph, deleted “required for the student’s grauation” at the beginning of the first sentence; added the second sentence of subdivision D 2; and inserted “and mathematics” three times in subdivision D 11.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 661 added subdivision D 13; and redesignated former subdivisions D 13 and D 14 as subdivisions D 14 and D 15, respectively.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 802 added present subdivision D 4 and redesignated former subdivisions D 4 through D 15 as present subdivisions D 5 through D 16, respectively.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 794 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” in the first sentence of subsection A; inserted subdivision D 10 and redesignated former subdivisions D 10 to 16 as subdivisions D 11 to 17; and added the last sentence in subdivision D 11.

The 2012 amendment by c. 845 added the second paragraph of subdivision D 13; and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 123 and 157 are identical, and in subdivision D 13, inserted “kindergarten through” in the first sentence and added the second and third sentences of the second paragraph, and added the third paragraph.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 498 and 530 are identical, and in subsection B, substituted “includes” for “shall include” in the last sentence of the eighth paragraph and added the ninth paragraph; and substituted “shall” for “must” near the beginning of the second sentence
in subdivision D 3 c; and substituted “kindergarten through grade 12” for “grades kindergarten through 12” in subdivision D 16.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 472 added subdivision D 3 d and made related changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 562 substituted “D 5” for “D 4” in the ninth paragraph of subsection B.

The 2015 amendment by c. 589 added subsection F.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 146 and 155 are identical, effective beginning with the 2018-2019 school year, and in subdivision D 15, substituted “activity” for “fitness,” and inserted “in grades kindergarten through five consisting of at least 20 minutes per day or an average of 100 minutes per week during the regular school year and available to all students in grades six through 12,” in the first sentence, substituted “(ii) recess, or (iv)” for “or (iii)” in the second sentence and substituted “implement” for “incorporate into its local wellness policy a goal for the implementation of” in the last sentence.

The 2016 amendments by c. 472 inserted “computer science and computational thinking, including computer coding” in the second paragraph in subsection B and the first paragraph in subsection C.

The 2016 amendment by c. 737 added subdivision D 18.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 100, in subdivision D 3 d, inserted the clause (i) designation and added clause (ii); and inserted “career and technical education programs” in the first sentence of subdivision D 11.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 138 inserted “including internships, externships apprenticeships, credentialing programs, certification programs, licensure programs, and other work-based learning experiences” and “and experiences” in subdivision D 11.

The 2018 amendment by c. 484 added “which programs may include dual language programs whereby such students receive instruction in English and in a second language” at the end of subdivision D 12.

The 2018 amendment by c. 485 added the last paragraph in subsection B.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 748 and 749 are identical, and substituted “D 3” for “D 5” in the ninth paragraph of subsection B.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 582, in subsection F, inserted “course credit” and “hereinafter referred to as College and Career Access Pathways Partnerships (Partnerships)” in the first sentence, substituted “Such Partnerships shall (i) specify the” for “Such agreements shall specify (i) the,” inserted “course credit or,” substituted “(ii) specify the credit, credentials” for “and (ii) the credentials,” and added clause (iii).

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 637 added subdivision D 3 e and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 167, effective July 1, 2021, in subdivision D 13, in the second paragraph, inserted the third and fourth sentences, substituted “such reading intervention services shall be” for “early intervention reading services will be” in the fifth sentence, and substituted “Such reading intervention services may be administered through the use of reading specialists; trained aides; trained volunteers” for “Reading intervention services may include the use of: special reading teachers; trained aides; volunteer tutors” in the seventh sentence and added the last full paragraph defining “Science of reading” at the end.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 168 added the last sentence in subdivision D 15.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 549 and 550 are identical, and in subdivision D 13, deleted “reading and” preceding “mathematics” twice in the first paragraph, deleted the second paragraph, which read: “Local school divisions shall provide reading intervention services to students in kindergarten through grade three who demonstrate deficiencies based on their individual performance on the Standards of Learning reading test or any reading diagnostic test that meets criteria established by the Department of Education. Local school divisions shall report the results of the diagnostic tests to the Department of Education on an annual basis, at a time to be determined by the Superintendent of Public Instruction. Such reading intervention services shall be evidence-based, including services that are grounded in the science of reading, and include (i) the components of effective reading instruction and (ii) explicit, systematic, sequential, and cumulative instruction, to include phonemic awareness, systematic phonics, fluency, vocabulary development, and text comprehension as appropriate based on the student's demonstrated reading deficiencies. The parent of each student who receives such reading intervention services shall be notified before the services begin in accordance with the provisions of § 22.1-215.2, and the progress of each such student shall be monitored throughout the provision of services. Each student who receives such reading intervention services shall be assessed again at the end of that school year. The local school division, in its discretion, shall provide such reading intervention services prior to promoting a student from grade three to grade four. Such reading intervention services may be administered through the use of reading specialists; trained aides; trained volunteers under the supervision of a certified teacher; computer-based reading tutorial programs; aides to instruct in-class groups while the teacher provides direct instruction to the students who need extra assistance; and extended instructional time in the school day or school year for these students. Funds appropriated for prevention, intervention, and remediation; summer school remediation; at-risk; or early intervention reading may be used to meet the requirements of this subdivision.”, deleted the fourth paragraph, which read: “As used in the subdivision:” and deleted the last paragraph, which read: “‘Science of reading’ means the study of the relationship between cognitive science and educational outcomes.”; and added subsections G and H.

Law Review.

For note, “Shuffling the Deck: Redistricting to Promote a Quality Education in Virginia,”
Va. L. Rev. 773 (2003).

For 2003/2004 survey of education law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 183 (2004).

For article, “Unlocking the Power of State Constitutions with Equal Protection: The First Step toward Education as a Federally Protected Right,” see 51 Wm. and Mary L. Rev. 1343 (2010).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, § 1.